District of Columbia statutes.
40-303.17

Undertaking to discharge liens before suit.

Such an undertaking as above mentioned may be offered before any suit brought in order to discharge the property from existing liens, in which case notice shall be given as aforesaid to the parties whose liens it is sought to have discharged, and the same proceedings shall be had as above directed in relation to the undertaking to be given after the commencement of the suit, and said undertaking shall be to the effect that the owner and his said sureties will pay any judgment that may be rendered in any suit that may thereafter be brought for the enforcement of said lien.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1387, ch. 854, § 1255
1981 Ed., § 38-119.
1973 Ed., § 38-119.